Utah statutes.
26-26-4.   Institution to pay transportation expense -- Restrictions on use of animals -- Fee.

The authorized institution shall provide, at its own expense, for the transportation of such animals from the establishment to the institution and shall use them only in the conduct of scientific and educational activities and for no other purpose.  The institution shall reimburse the establishment for animals received.  The fee shall be, at a minimum, $15 for cats and $20 for dogs.  That fee shall be increased as determined by the department, based on fluctuations or changes in the Consumer Price Index.



Amended by Chapter 80, 1989 General Session

